Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5024.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.9 of the General Laws entitled "Benefit Determination and
Utilization Review Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.9-16. Utilization review decisions.
(a) A utilization review decision shall not retrospectively deny coverage for healthcare
services provided to a covered person, when prior approval has been obtained from the insurer or
its designee for those services, unless the approval was based upon fraudulent, materially
inaccurate, or misrepresented information submitted by the covered person, authorized person, or
the provider.
(b) For health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section,
an insurer shall not require or conduct a prospective or concurrent review for a prescription
medicine:
(1) That is used in the treatment of alcohol or opioid use disorder;
(2) That contains Methadone, Buprenorphine or Naltrexone; or
(3) That was approved before the effective date of this section by the United States Food
and Drug Administration for the mitigation of opioid withdrawal symptoms.
(c) In conducting utilization reviews for Medicaid benefits, each Medicaid managed care
organization shall use the medical necessity criteria selected by the Rhode Island division of
insurance for making determinations of medical necessity and clinical appropriateness pursuant to

the utilization review plan.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000318
========
LC000318 - Page 2 of 3